Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 19
FIRE ESCAPES AND DOORS

Sec.

§ 39-1901. Fire escapes to be provided for certain structures. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2013. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 41-253 and 41-256.

§ 39-1902. How attached. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 104, § 2, effective July 1, 2013. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 41-253 and 41-256.

§ 39-1903. Application of chapter to school districts. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1904. Penalty for violating preceding sections. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 104, § 3, effective July 1, 2013. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 41-253 and 41-256.

§ 39-1905. Doors on public buildings

Penalty. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 104, § 4, effective July 1, 2013. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 41-253 and 41-256.